Hawaii, session 2025, HB618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. The legislature finds that certain state employees faced a heightened risk of exposure to coronavirus disease 2019 during the pandemic due to the nature of their work and the need for their consistent in-person presence.  These employees, including those in bargaining units 5, 6, and 7, provided essential services to the public, often in challenging and potentially hazardous environments.  Their dedication and sacrifice helped to maintain critical functions of the State and ensured the well-being of Hawaii's residents. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to award a one-time hazard pay bonus in recognition of and as compensation for the extraordinary services provided by the members of bargaining units 5, 6, and 7, and their exclusive counterparts during the pandemic.  This Act serves as a token of appreciation for their commitment and acknowledges the risks they undertook to fulfill their duties. PART II SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for a one-time hazard pay bonus for state officers and employees in bargaining units 5, 6, and 7, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for state officers and employees in bargaining unit 5; (2)  $ for state officers and employees in bargaining unit 6; and (3)  $ for state officers and employees in bargaining unit 7; provided that, to be eligible for the one-time hazard pay bonus, the state officer or employee must have been employed as a member of bargaining unit 5, 6, or 7 during a time period between and . SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure for the purposes of this part. PART III SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for a one-time hazard pay bonus for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans as those state officers and employees within bargaining units 5, 6, and 7, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for state officers and employees excluded from collective bargaining and belonging to the same compensation plans as bargaining unit 5; (2)  $ for state officers and employees excluded from collective bargaining and belonging to the same compensation plans as bargaining unit 6; and (3)  $ for state officers and employees excluded from collective bargaining and belonging to the same compensation plans as bargaining unit 7; provided that, to be eligible for the one-time hazard pay bonus, the state officer or employee excluded from collective bargaining must have been employed as a state officer or employee who were and belonged to the same compensation plans as those state officers and employees within bargaining unit 5, 6, or 7 during the time period between            and . SECTION 5. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure for the purposes of this part. PART IV SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________